Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
C. Revocation of Certificate of Authority

§ 17-16-1530.
Grounds for revocation.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under W.S.

17-16-1531

to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if:

The corporation does not deliver its annual reports or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1630

;

Reserved;

The foreign corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state;

The foreign corporation does not inform the secretary of state under W.S.

17-28-102

or

17-28-103

that its registered agent or registered office has changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued within thirty (30) days of the change, resignation or discontinuance;

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the foreign corporation signed a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

Reserved;

The corporation has failed to respond to a valid and enforceable subpoena; or

Has provided fraudulent information or has failed to correct false information upon request of the secretary of state on any filing under this act with the secretary of state; or

Cannot be served either by the registered agent or by mail or electronically by the secretary of state acting as the agent for process.

It is in the public interest and the corporation:

Has provided fraudulent information or has failed to correct false information upon request of the secretary of state on any filing under this act with the secretary of state; or

Cannot be served either by the registered agent or by mail or electronically by the secretary of state acting as the agent for process.

The foreign corporation has failed to pay any penalties imposed under W.S.

17-28-109

.

Prior to commencing a proceeding under W.S.

17-16-1531

the secretary of state may classify a foreign corporation as delinquent awaiting administrative revocation if the foreign corporation meets any of the criteria in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, § 2; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, effective January 1, 2009, deleted “for thirty (30) days or more” from the end of (a)(i); and substituted “17-28-102 or

17-28-103

” for “17-16-1508 or 17-16-1509” in (a)(ii).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, § 2, effective January 1, 2009, added (a)(v); redesignated former (a)(v) as (a)(vi); added (b) and made a related change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (a)(ix).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(vii)(B) and (a)(viii)(B), deleted "by" following "served," added "by" following "either" and "or electronically" following "mail."

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-1531.
Procedure for and effect of revocation.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under W.S.

17-16-1530

for revocation of a certificate of authority, he shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of his determination under W.S.

17-28-104

.

If the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under W.S.

17-28-104

, the secretary of state may revoke the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority by signing, either manually or in facsimile, a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

.

The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

The secretary of state’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the secretary of state the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the secretary of state under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation. Upon receipt of process, the secretary of state shall either:

Mail a copy of the process to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report or in any subsequent communication received from the corporation stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for a certificate of authority; or

Electronically submit a copy of the process to the foreign corporation’s email address.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, §§ 2, 3; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch 90 § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-16-1510” in (a) and twice in (b).

The second 2008 amendment by ch 91 §§ 2, 3, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by deleting “except for revocation pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1530(a)(iv) in which case notice of the proposed revocation shall be given only as provided in subsection (f) of this section” at the end of (a); deleting the former last sentence of (b) which read: “The provisions of subsection (f) of this section shall govern the procedures for revocation pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1530(a)(iv)”; and repealing former (f) relating to notice to the corporation of revocation.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated former (d) as (d) and (d)(i); added "either" at the end of (d); added "or" at the end of (d)(i); added (d)(ii); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

§ 17-16-1532.
Appeal from revocation.

A foreign corporation may appeal the secretary of state’s revocation of its certificate of authority pursuant to W.S.

16-3-114

, within thirty (30) days after service of the certificate of revocation is perfected under W.S.

17-28-104

. The foreign corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of its certificate of authority and the secretary of state’s certificate of revocation.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the certificate of authority or may take any other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, substituted “17-28-104” for “17-16-1510” in (a).

§ 17-16-1533.
Applicability of chapter to foreign limited liability companies.

To the extent not inconsistent with the Wyoming Limited Liability Company Act, W.S.

17-29-101

through

17-29-1105

and the provisions of this chapter, a limited liability company organized in another jurisdiction shall do business in Wyoming by complying with the applicable provisions of this article. The certificate of authority of a limited liability company organized in another jurisdiction shall be revoked and reinstated as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 196, § 4; 1999, ch. 67, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2010, ch. 94, § 2; 2015 ch. 156, § 2, effective January 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 42, § 2, effective March 4, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-16-1507” for “17-16-1510,” inserting “17-28-101 through

17-28-111

” and making related stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Wyoming Limited Liability Company Act, W.S.

17-29-101

through

17-29-1102

” for “Wyoming Limited Liability Act, W.S.

17-15-101

through

17-15-144

.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in the first sentence, inserted “and the provisions of this chapter,” and substituted “the applicable provisions of this article” for “W.S.

17-16-1501

through

17-16-1507

,

17-16-1520

,

17-16-1530

through

17-16-1532

and

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

”; in the last sentence, substituted “authority” for “organization,” inserted “and reinstated as provided in this act” for “as provided in W.S.

17-16-1530

through

17-16-1532

.”

The 2016 amendment

, substituted “17-29-1105” for “17-29-1102” and “shall” for “may” twice.

Laws 2016, ch. 42 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

Editor's note.

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

§ 17-16-1534.
Applicability of chapter 23 to foreign statutory trust companies.

To the extent not inconsistent with the Wyoming Statutory Trust Act, W.S.

17-23-101

through

17-23-302

, a statutory trust as defined in W.S. 17-23-102(a)(v), which is organized in another jurisdiction may do business in Wyoming by complying with W.S.

17-16-1501

through

17-16-1507

,

17-16-1520

and

17-16-1530

through

17-16-1532

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 16, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 1, 2009, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-16-1507” for “17-16-1510.”

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.